Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2301
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2301 to 38-2324 shall be known and may be cited as the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 26;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 47;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1704;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 793;

Laws 2012, LB1042, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB107, § 2.